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DTC P0773/64 Shift Solenoid E Electrical Malfunction
(SL Solenoid Valve )

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The SL solenoid valve is turned ON and OFF by signals from the Engine and ECT ECU to control the hydrau-
licpressureactingon the lock −uprelayvalve,which thencontrolsoperationof the lock −upclutch.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0773/64

Either (a) or (b) is detected for 1 time.
(a)Solenoid resistance is8 � or less (short circuit)when the
solenoid isenergized.
(b)Solenoid resistance is100k � ormore (opencircuit)when
the solenoid is not energized.

SOpenorshort inSLsolenoidvalvecircuit
SSLsolenoidvalve
SEngineandECTECU

Fail safe function
If the Engine and ECT ECU detects a malfunction, it turns the SL solenoid valve OFF.
WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Measure resistance between terminal SL of Engine and ECT ECU and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door

(See page BO−127).
(b) Disconnect the connector from Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal SL of Engine and ECT
ECU and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F)

OK Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−35).
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2 Check harness and connector between Engine and ECT ECU and automatic
transmission solenoid connector.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the solenoid connector from the transmission.
CHECK:
Check the harness between terminal SL of Engine and ECT
ECU and terminal SL of transmission solenoid connector.
OK:

There is no open or short circuit.

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector.

OK
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3 Check SL solenoid valve.

Electrical Check:
PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.
(d) Remove the SL solenoid valve.
CHECK:
(a) Measure resistance between terminal SL of solenoid

valve and solenoid body.
(b)Connectpositive ¨ leadof thebattery to terminalof sole-

noidconnector,negative © leadof thebattery tosolenoid
body.

OK:
(1)Resistance: 11−1 5 � at20 ˚ C(68 ˚ F)
(2) The SL solenoid valve makes operating noise.

Mechanical Check:
PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.
(d) Remove the SL solenoid valve.
CHECK:
(a)Applying490kPa(5kgf/cm

2
,71psi)of compressedair,

check that thesolenoidvalvedoesnot leakair.
(b) When battery positive voltage is supplied to the solenoid

valve, check that the solenoid valve opens.
OK:

(a) Solenoid valve does not leak air
(b) Solenoid valve opens

NG Replace the SL solenoid valve.

OK

Repair or replace the solenoid wire.


